Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2217
Appeals; manner.

Appellate review under this code shall be governed by section 30-1601.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 17, UPC § 1-308.

Appeals of matters arising under the Nebraska Probate Code are reviewed for error on the record. In re Conservatorship of Estate of Martin, 228 Neb. 103, 421 N.W.2d 463 (1988).